Tennessee, session 114, HB2459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-176(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(10) A school social worker, licensed by the state board of education, provides
preventative and developmental counseling.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2459
011038
- 1 -